Utah statutes.
56-1-33.   First-aid kits -- Failure to comply with order or regulation -- Penalty.

Any person failing to comply with an order or regulation of the commission authorized by this act shall be liable to a penalty of $25 for each day of noncompliance. The attorney general shall file suit on behalf of the state for any unpaid penalty within one year after the penalty accrues.

